Utah statutes.
24-4-110.   Attorney fees and costs.

(1)  In any forfeiture proceeding under this chapter, the court may award a prevailing party reasonable:

(a)  legal costs; and

(b)  attorney fees.

(2)  The legal costs and attorney fees awarded by the court to the prevailing party may not exceed 20% of the value of the property.

(3)  A party that prevails only in part is entitled to recover reasonable legal costs and attorney fees only on those issues on which the party prevailed.



Enacted by Chapter 394, 2013 General Session

